Massachusetts, session 194th, S2331.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 135A. Chapter 128 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 1A the following section:- 
Section 1B. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall, unless the 
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings: 
"Agritourism", an agriculturally related educational, entertainment, historical, cultural, 
commercial, or recreational activity that allows or invites members of the general public to 
observe, participate in, experience and enjoy that activity, and that serves to encourage the 
purchase of agricultural products grown on the land where the activity takes place. 

of 2 9  “Land”, an entire parcel of land or multiple contiguous whole parcels of land owned by 
the same person. 
(b) Agritourism may be conducted on land primarily used for commercial agriculture, 
aquaculture, silviculture, horticulture, floriculture or viticulture. Agritourism may be conducted 
on land not primarily used for commercial agriculture, aquaculture, silviculture, horticulture, 
floriculture or viticulture if: (i) at least 75 per cent of the acreage of said land is dedicated to 
agriculture; (ii) at least 50 per cent of the agricultural product produced on said land, by either 
gross annual sales or annual volume, is utilized in agritourism activities; (iii) at least 25 per cent 
of the gross annual income from all activities on the land on which the agritourism activity is 
located results from the sale of products that have been produced on said land; and (iv) at least an 
additional 50 per cent of the gross annual income from all activities on said land results from the 
sale of products that have been produced on said land or on land in Massachusetts used for the 
primary purpose of commercial agriculture, aquaculture, silviculture, horticulture, floriculture or 
viticulture.